Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8416.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-23-46 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-23 entitled "Subdivision
of Land" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-23-46. General provisions — Construction and/or improvement guarantees.
(a) The local regulations shall require approval of the permitting authority of agreements
for the completion of all required public improvements prior to final plan approval in the form of:
(1) Completion of actual construction of all improvements; (2) Improvement guarantees; or (3)
Combination thereof. As to the town of Coventry, the local regulations shall require approval of
the permitting authority of agreements for the completion of all required public and private
improvements prior to final plan approval in the form of:
(1) Completion of actual construction of all improvements;
(2) Improvement guarantees; or
(3) Combination thereof.
(b) Where improvements are constructed without a financial guarantee, the work is to be
completed prior to final approval. All construction shall be inspected by the appropriate town staff
or agents in a timely manner and approved under the direction of the administrative officer and
according to local regulations.
(c) Improvement guarantees shall be in an amount and with all necessary conditions to
secure for the municipality the actual construction and complete installation of all the required
improvements, within the period specified by the permitting authority. The amount shall be based

on actual cost estimates for all required public improvements and these estimates shall be reviewed
and approved by the permitting authority. The permitting authority may fix the guarantee in a
reasonable amount in excess of the estimated costs to anticipate for economic or construction
conditions. Local regulations may include provisions for the review and/or upgrade of guarantees.
(d) The security shall be in the forms of financial instruments set forth in local regulations
and shall enable the municipality to gain timely access to the secured funds, for cause. The local
regulations shall provide at least three (3) acceptable forms of financial security and the approving
authority shall not limit the security to one specific form of the acceptable forms set forth in the
local regulations.
(e) The local regulations shall establish procedures for the setting of improvement
guarantee amounts; for inspections of improvements; for acceptance of improvements by the
municipality; and for the release of the improvement guarantees to the applicant. Procedures may
include provisions for partial releases of the guarantees as stages of the improvements are
completed, inspected, and approved under the coordination of the administrative officer and
reported to the permitting authority.
(f) In the cases of developments and subdivisions that are being approved and constructed
in phases, the permitting authority shall specify improvement guarantee requirements related to
each particular phase.
(g) The permitting authority may also require maintenance guarantees to be provided for a
one-year period subsequent to completion, inspection, and acceptance of the improvement(s) unless
there are extenuating circumstances. Such maintenance guarantee shall not exceed ten percent
(10%) of the original guarantee amount, or the original cost of the public improvements if no
guarantee was required.
(h) Procedures for the acceptance of required improvements shall stipulate that all
improvements, once inspected and approved, shall be accepted by the municipality or other
appropriate municipal agency for maintenance and/or part of the municipal system.
(i) The municipality is granted the power to enforce the guarantees by all appropriate legal
and equitable remedies.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006283
========
LC006283 - Page 2 of 3